Illinois, session 104th, SB2741.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Sections 26.5-2 and 26.5-3 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/26.5-2)7    Sec. 26.5-2. Harassment by telephone.8    (a) A person commits harassment by telephone when he or 9she uses telephone communication for any of the following 10purposes:11        (1) Making any comment, request, suggestion or 12    proposal which is obscene, lewd, lascivious, filthy or 13    indecent with an intent to offend; 14        (1.1) Making any comment, request, suggestion, or 15    proposal which is known or intended to cause another 16    person significant emotional distress and would cause a 17    reasonable person to experience significant emotional 18    distress; 19        (2) Making a telephone call, whether or not 20    conversation ensues, with intent to abuse, threaten injury 21    to, or the property of, any person at the called number or 22    to any of his or her family or household members or harass 23    any person at the called number;   SB2741 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 16302 RLC 29688 b1        (3) Making or causing the telephone of another 2    repeatedly to ring, with intent to harass any person at 3    the called number; 4        (4) Making repeated telephone calls, during which 5    conversation ensues, solely to harass any person at the 6    called number; 7        (5) Making a telephone call or knowingly inducing a 8    person to make a telephone call for the purpose of 9    harassing another person who is under 13 years of age, 10    regardless of whether the person under 13 years of age 11    consents to the harassment, if the defendant is at least 12    16 years of age at the time of the commission of the 13    offense; or 14        (6) Knowingly permitting any telephone under one's 15    control to be used for any of the purposes mentioned 16    herein. 17    (b) Every telephone directory published for distribution 18to members of the general public shall contain a notice 19setting forth a summary of the provisions of this Section. The 20notice shall be printed in type which is no smaller than any 21other type on the same page and shall be preceded by the word 22"WARNING". All telephone companies in this State shall 23cooperate with law enforcement agencies in using their 24facilities and personnel to detect and prevent violations of 25this Article. 26(Source: P.A. 97-1108, eff. 1-1-13.)   SB2741 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 16302 RLC 29688 b1    (720 ILCS 5/26.5-3)2    Sec. 26.5-3. Harassment through electronic communications.3    (a) A person commits harassment through electronic 4communications when he or she uses electronic communication 5for any of the following purposes:6        (1) Making any comment, request, suggestion or 7    proposal which is obscene with an intent to offend; 8        (1.1) Making any comment, request, suggestion, or 9    proposal which is known or intended to cause another 10    person significant emotional distress and would cause a 11    reasonable person to experience significant emotional 12    distress; 13        (2) Interrupting, with the intent to harass, the 14    telephone service or the electronic communication service 15    of any person, including transmitting any file, document, 16    or other communication which prevents that person from 17    using his or her telephone service or electronic 18    communications device; 19        (3) Transmitting to any person, with the intent to 20    harass, abuse, or threaten injury to, or the property of, 21    the person to whom an electronic communication is 22    directed, or to any of his or her family or household 23    members, and regardless of whether the communication is 24    read in its entirety or at all, any file, document, or 25    other communication which prevents that person from using   SB2741 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 16302 RLC 29688 b1    his or her telephone service or electronic communications 2    device; 3        (4) Transmitting an electronic communication or 4    knowingly inducing a person to transmit an electronic 5    communication for the purpose of harassing another person 6    who is under 13 years of age, regardless of whether the 7    person under 13 years of age consents to the harassment, 8    if the defendant is at least 16 years of age at the time of 9    the commission of the offense; 10        (5) Making repeated electronic communications, during 11    which conversation or text or email messages ensue, solely 12    to harass the person to whom the electronic communication 13    is directed Threatening injury to the person or to the 14    property of the person to whom an electronic communication 15    is directed or to any of his or her family or household 16    members; or 17        (6) Knowingly permitting any electronic communications 18    device to be used for any of the purposes mentioned in this 19    subsection (a). 20    (b) Telecommunications carriers, commercial mobile service 21providers, and providers of information services, including, 22but not limited to, Internet service providers and hosting 23service providers, are not liable under this Section, except 24for willful and wanton misconduct, by virtue of the 25transmission, storage, or caching of electronic communications 26or messages of others or by virtue of the provision of other   SB2741 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 16302 RLC 29688 b1related telecommunications, commercial mobile services, or 2information services used by others in violation of this 3Section. 4(Source: P.A. 97-1108, eff. 1-1-13.)